Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB259.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 17 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Domestic violence offender registry" means the registry for domestic
violence established in subsection (2) of this section;
(b) "Domestic violence offense" means a crime under KRS Chapter 507, 508,
509, or 525.070, when the relationship between the perpetrator and the
victim meets the definition of family member or member of an unmarried
couple as defined in KRS 403.720;
(c) "Cabinet" means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet; and
(d) "Persistent offender" means any person eighteen (18) years of age or older
at the time of the offense, or any youthful offender as defined in KRS
600.020, who has been:
1. Convicted of, pled guilty to, or entered an Alford plea to at least two
(2) domestic violence offenses; or
2. Placed on pretrial diversion pursuant to KRS 533.250 for at least two
(2) domestic violence offenses until the diversionary period is
successfully completed.
(2) The cabinet shall:
(a) Develop and implement a domestic violence offender registry;
(b) Create a website that is available to the public that contains:
1. The persistent offender's name, date of birth, and county of residence;
2. The conviction date;
3. A brief description of the crime or crimes committed; and
4. A current photograph; and
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1553
(c) Maintain the registry using information submitted to the cabinet by court
clerks pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and information available
from the Department of Corrections and local law enforcement agencies.
(3) (a) If a person is convicted of a domestic violence offense and has at least one
(1) prior conviction for a domestic violence offense, the court shall order the
person to register as a persistent offender on the domestic violence offender
registry.
(b) The court clerk shall submit to the cabinet a certified copy of the qualifying
conviction and the date of birth of the person within seven (7) days of the
conviction.
(c) 1. If available to the court clerk, he or she shall submit to the cabinet a
copy of the person's driver's license, or other state or federal
identification, and any other identifying data the cabinet determines is
necessary to identify the person correctly and exclude innocent
persons.
2. A registrant's:
a. Address;
b. Social Security number,
c. Driver's license number; or
d. Any other state or federal identification number;
shall not be available to the public on the registry.
(4) The cabinet shall remove a registrant's information from the registry:
(a) Five (5) years after the date of the most recent conviction for a domestic
violence offense if the registrant has one (1) prior domestic violence
conviction;
(b) Seven (7) years after the date of the most recent conviction for a domestic
violence offense if the registrant offender has two (2) prior domestic
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:12 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1553
violence convictions;
(c) Ten (10) years after the date of the most recent conviction for a domestic
violence offense if the registrant has three (3) prior domestic violence
convictions; or
(d) Twenty (20) years after the date of the most recent conviction for a domestic
violence offense if the registrant has four (4) prior domestic violence
convictions.
(5) A registrant shall pay a registration fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) to the
clerk of the court imposing the sentence, who shall:
(a) Retain fifty dollars ($50) for administration; and
(b) Remit one hundred dollars ($100) to the Department of Kentucky State
Police.
(6) This Act applies only to persistent offenders convicted on or after January 1,
2027. A prior conviction is not required to occur on or after January 1, 2027.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/25/2026 3:12 PM Jacketed